Montana, session 2025, HB769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-18-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-18-502. Computation of meal allowance. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4), an
employee is eligible for the meal allowance provided in 2-18-501, only if the employee is in a travel status for
more than 3 continuous hours during the following hours:
(a) for non-night-shift hours:
(a)(i) for the morning meal allowance, between the hours of 12:01 a.m. and 10 a.m.;
(b)(ii) for the midday meal allowance, between the hours of 10:01 a.m. and 3 p.m.; and
(c)(iii) for the evening meal allowance, between the hours of 3:01 p.m. and 12 midnight;
(b) for night-shift hours:
(i) for the evening meal allowance, between the hours of 12:01 p.m. and 10 p.m.;
(ii) for the midnight meal allowance, between the hours of 10:01 p.m. and 3 a.m.; and
(iii) for the early morning meal allowance, between the hours of 3:01 a.m. and 12 noon.
(2) An eligible employee may receive:
(a) only one of the three meal allowances provided, if the travel was performed within the
employee's assigned travel shift; or
(b) a maximum of two meal allowances if the travel begins before or was completed after the
employee's assigned travel shift and the travel did not exceed 24 hours.
(3) "Travel shift" is that period of time beginning 1 hour before and terminating 1 hour after the
employee's normally assigned work shift.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 769
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 769
(4) An appointed member of a state board, commission, or council or a member of a legislative
subcommittee or select or interim committee is entitled to a midday meal allowance on a day the individual is
attending a meeting of the board, commission, council, or committee, regardless of proximity of the meeting
place to the individual's residence or headquarters. This subsection does not apply to a member of a legislative
committee during a legislative session.
(5) The department of administration shall prescribe policies necessary to effectively administer
this section for state government."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 769
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 769, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 769
INTRODUCED BY E. MATTHEWS, S. NOVAK, J. ISALY, E. TILLEMAN, D. HARVEY, K. WALSH
AN ACT REVISING THE COMPUTATION OF MEAL ALLOWANCES FOR CERTAIN EMPLOYEES THAT
WORK NIGHT-SHIFT HOURS; AMENDING SECTION 2-18-502, MCA.”